Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 10 Public Building Authorities Act of 1971
12-10-111. Bonds of the authority — Issuance — Terms — Refunding — Payment.

Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, all bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenue and receipts derived from the authority's projects or of any thereof as may be designated in the proceedings of the board of directors under which the bonds shall be authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the lessee or contracting party obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project. Such bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series, may be executed and delivered by the authority at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denomination and of such terms and maturities, may be subject to redemption prior to maturity either with or without premium, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without this state, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued.

Bonds and notes issued under this chapter in registered form shall be executed in the manner provided for in the Tennessee Public Obligations Registration Act, compiled in title 9, chapter 19.

Bonds and notes, and any interest coupons attached thereto, issued under this chapter which are not in registered form shall be executed in the name of the authority by such officers of the authority and in such manner as the board of directors may direct, and shall be sealed with the corporate seal of the authority. If so provided in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or notes, the facsimile signature of any of the officers of the authority may appear on such bonds or notes and a facsimile of the corporate seal of the authority may appear on the bonds or notes in lieu of the manual signature of such officer and the manual impress of such seal; provided, that at least one (1) of the signatures appearing on such bonds or notes shall be a manual signature. Interest coupons attached to such bonds or notes shall be executed with the facsimile signatures of the officers who shall execute the bonds or notes, who shall adopt as and for their own signatures their respective facsimile signatures appearing on such coupons.

Bonds or notes issued under this chapter, and the coupons appurtenant thereto, if any, bearing the signature of any officer in office on the date of signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof, such person shall have ceased to be an officer of the authority.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the authority to be most advantageous, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof.

All bonds of the authority and the interest coupons applicable thereto are hereby made and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

Interim certificates or notes or other temporary obligations issued by the authority pending the issuance of its revenue bonds shall be payable out of revenues and receipts in like manner as such revenue bonds and shall be retired from the proceeds of such bonds upon the issuance thereof, and shall be in such form and contain such terms, conditions and provisions consistent with this chapter as the board of directors may determine.

Any bonds or notes of the authority or any other authority at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the authority by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums thereon;

Unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as hereinafter provided, interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the board of directors, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the board of directors to be most advantageous or necessary to the authority;

A reasonable reserve for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds and/or a renewal and replacement reserve;

If the project to be constructed from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced has not been completed, an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on the refunding bonds during the construction of such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, but only to the extent that interest charges have not been capitalized from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced; and

Expenses of the authority, including bond discount, deemed by the board of directors to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds. A determination by the board of directors that any refinancing is advantageous or necessary to the authority, or that any of the amounts provided in the preceding sentence should be included in such refinancing, or that any of the obligations to be refinanced should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date or permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity, shall be conclusive; provided, that prior to the adoption by the board of directors of the resolution authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds under this section, the plan for refunding shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report thereon to the board of directors within fifteen (15) days from the date the plan is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed refunding plan. After receiving the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the refunding plan is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the board of directors may take such action with reference to such proposed refunding plan as it deems advisable.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations to be refunded thereby, or by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

If, at the time of delivery of the refunding bonds, the obligations to be refunded will not be retired or a valid and timely notice of redemption of the outstanding obligations is not given in accordance with the resolution, indenture or other instrument governing the redemption of the outstanding obligations, then, prior to the issuance of the refunding bonds, the board of directors shall cause to be given a notice of its intention to issue the refunding bonds. The notice shall be given either by mail to the owners of all the outstanding obligations to be refunded at their addresses shown on the bond registration records for the outstanding obligations or given by publication one (1) time each in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, having a national circulation. The notice shall set forth the estimated date of delivery of the refunding bonds and identify the obligations, or the individual maturities thereof, proposed to be refunded; provided, that, if portions of individual maturities are proposed to be refunded, the notice shall identify the maturities subject to partial refunding and the aggregate principal amount to be refunded within each maturity. If the issuance of the refunding bonds does not occur as provided in the notice, the governing body shall cause notice thereof to be given as provided above. Except as otherwise set forth in this subsection (h), the notice required pursuant to this subsection (h) shall be given whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows, either:

To the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

To the extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then such proceeds shall be deposited in trust and together with any investment income thereon to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but provision may be made for the pledging and application of any surplus for any purposes of the authority including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds or other obligations of the authority. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in this state if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of the obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

The board of an authority may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds and its refunding bonds providing for delivery on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, in the case of bonds and not greater than the later of the first date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or at par, whichever is earlier, only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that such an agreement or contract is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with subsection (l ). Agreements to sell bonds or refunding bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement to sell the bonds or refunding bonds do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee pursuant to subsection (l ).

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds and refunding bonds issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, at any time during the term of the bonds or refunding bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this subsection (k) are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in subsection (m), an authority, by resolution, may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the board of the authority may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the authority to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement. Such a contract or agreement to be entered into by an authority with respect to bonds or refunding bonds issued to fund or finance a lease agreement, loan agreement or operating contract with a municipal corporation must also be approved by the governing body of the municipal corporation.

The state funding board shall establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the agreements and contracts referenced in subsections (j) and (k) and § 12-10-116(c), which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The conditions under which such agreements or contracts can be entered into;

The methods by which such contracts are to be solicited and procured;

The form and content such contracts shall take;

The aspects of risk exposure associated with such contracts;

The standards and procedures for counterparty selection, including rating criteria;

The procurement of credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, or the setting aside of reserves in connection with such contracts or agreements;

The methods of securing the financial interest in such contracts;

The methods to be used to reflect such contracts in the authority's or municipal corporation's financial statements;

Financial monitoring and periodic assessment of such contracts by the authority or municipal corporation;

The application and source of nonperiodic payments; and

Educational requirements for officials of the authority or the municipal corporation responsible for approving any such contract or agreement.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the authority or the governing body of the municipal corporation of a resolution authorizing such contract or agreement, a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines and shall report thereon to the authority or municipal corporation. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board or the comptroller of the treasury shall fail to report within the fifteen-day period, then the authority or the municipal corporation may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations, then the authority or the municipal corporation is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The guidelines, rules or regulations shall provide for an appeal process to a determination of noncompliance.

When entering into any contracts or agreements facilitating the issuance and sale of bonds or refunding bonds, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the bonds or refunding bonds evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the authority may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any authority or municipal corporation against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court located in Tennessee which would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against such authority or municipal corporation.

In addition to any other investments authorized herein, cities, counties, or metropolitan governments may invest, or cause to be invested, the proceeds of loans to such cities, counties, or metropolitan governments from a public building authority in a guaranteed investment contract chosen or established by such public building authority provided:

Such guaranteed investment contract has a defined termination date not exceeding five (5) years from the date of the issuance of the obligation by the public building authority for the purpose of funding such loans;

Such guaranteed investment contract is secured by obligations described in § 9-4-103 and secured at a level as required by § 9-4-105;

Such guaranteed investment contract is issued by an issuer having a credit rating of at least AA or its equivalent, by at least one (1) nationally recognized rating agency; and

The obligations securing such guaranteed investment contract are deposited with an independent third party selected by the public building authority and are pledged to the cities, counties, and metropolitan governments receiving such loans.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 11; 1977, ch. 92, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-911; Acts 1982, ch. 902, § 9; 1988, ch. 826, § 1; 1997, ch. 405, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 426, §§ 1, 4; 2001, ch. 253, § 14; 2002, ch. 545, § 1; 2010, ch. 868, § 76.

12-10-112. Security for bonds — Enforcement — Revision of lease, loan agreement or sales contract charges.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the authority shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the same shall be made payable and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made, and by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the authority's interest in and rights under the leases, sales contracts, or loan agreements relating to such projects, or any part thereof. The proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents for any portions thereof leased by the authority to others, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this chapter. Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made shall have been fully paid. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreement of the authority made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security therefor, such payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of such remedies.

The board of directors of any authority issuing bonds under provisions of this chapter shall charge, collect and revise from time to time, whenever necessary, rents and charges for the rental of projects or parts thereof or installment payments under any loan agreement or sales contract with respect thereto, the revenues from which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, sufficient to pay for the operation and maintenance of such projects and such portion of the administrative costs of the authority as may be provided in the lease or leases of such projects or the loan agreement or agreements or the sales contract or contracts with respect thereto, and to pay such bonds and the interest thereon as the same become due, including such reserves as may be determined to be necessary by the board of directors.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 12; T.C.A., § 12-912; Acts 1982, ch. 902, § 10; 1984, ch. 823, § 6.

12-10-113. Tax exemption — Status under securities law.

The authority is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the municipality with respect to which it is organized, and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the authority and all properties at any time owned by it, and the income therefrom, and all bonds issued by it, and the income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxation in this state.

Also, for purposes of the Securities Law of 1955, formerly compiled in §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 [repealed], and any amendment thereto or substitution therefor, bonds issued by the authority shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of this state.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 13; T.C.A., § 12-913.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly compiled in §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 27. The Tennessee Securities Act of 1980 is compiled in title 48, ch. 1, part 1.

12-10-114. Nonliability of municipality.

The municipality shall not in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by the authority, and none of the bonds of the authority or any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a municipality may, by a written indemnity agreement, agree to indemnify an authority and its directors, officers and employees against losses, claims, expenses, costs, obligations, debts, suits, demands, actions and liabilities, including those arising from the authority's negligence, which are asserted against the authority, or its directors, officers or employees in connection with any project undertaken by the authority, and such indemnity agreement shall be enforceable against the municipality in accordance with its terms, including any such indemnity agreement in effect on May 7, 1998.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 14; T.C.A., § 12-914; Acts 1998, ch. 904, § 1.

12-10-115. Payments under lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract — Tax and other methods.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), whenever, and as often as, a municipal corporation having taxing power enters into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract with a public building authority or other contracting party under this chapter, the governing body of such municipal corporation shall provide by resolution for the levy and collection of a tax sufficient to pay when due the annual amount payable under such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract as and when it becomes due and payable, and to pay any expenses of maintaining and operating the project required to be paid by the municipal corporation under the terms of such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract or by instrument collateral thereto and, furthermore, to pledge such tax and the full faith and credit of the municipal corporation to such payments. Such tax shall be assessed, levied, collected and paid in like manner as other taxes of the municipal corporation. Such tax shall not be included within any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount for such municipal corporation but shall be excluded therefrom and be in addition thereto and in excess thereof, notwithstanding and without regard to the prohibitions, restrictions or requirements of any other law, whether public or private. There shall be set aside from such tax levy into a special fund an amount sufficient for the payment of the annual amount due under any such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract and the money in such fund shall be used exclusively for such purpose and shall not be used for any other purpose until such annual amount has been paid in full. The foregoing shall not be construed to limit the power of the authority or other contracting party to enter into leases, loan agreements, sales contracts or operating contracts with municipal corporations not having the power of taxation.

Except for a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract entered into for school purposes as specified in § 49-3-1004, and except as provided in subsection (b), before any municipal corporation having the power of taxation enters into any lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract with a public building authority under this part, the municipal corporation must comply with the resolution, notice and election provisions found in §§ 9-21-205 — 9-21-212. If such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract is done to retire or refund existing debt, then the resolution, notice and election requirements need not be followed.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a municipal corporation may enter into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract with a public building authority or other contracting party under this chapter payable exclusively from the revenues of one (1) or more projects of the municipal corporation, if the governing body of such municipal corporation shall provide by resolution that the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract shall be so payable. The obligations of the municipal corporation under such a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract shall be secured solely by a pledge of and lien on the revenues so pledged, and, in the case of a utility district, a statutory lien in the nature of a mortgage lien upon any utility system or systems of such district, which pledge and lien shall be in favor of the public building authority or other contracting party pursuant to this chapter, and their assigns, and all such property shall remain subject to such pledge and lien until the payment in full of the obligations of the municipal corporation under the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract. If the governing body of the municipal corporation shall provide for a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract solely payable from and secured by such revenues, no recourse shall be had for the payment of any obligations thereunder against the general funds of the municipal corporation, nor shall the full faith and credit or taxing power, if any, of the municipal corporation, be deemed to be pledged to the payment of the obligations. Such obligations shall not be a debt of the municipal corporation, nor a charge, lien or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the municipal corporation or upon any income, receipts or revenues of the municipal corporation other than revenues pledged to the payment of the obligations as provided herein.

The pledge of and lien on revenues and the statutory mortgage lien hereinabove described shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of the public building authority or contracting party, or their assigns, until the obligations secured are paid and performed in full. The priority of any pledge or lien with respect to competing pledges or liens shall be determined by the date such pledge or lien is created or granted and neither the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract nor any other instrument granting, creating or giving notice of the pledge or lien needs to be filed or recorded in order to preserve or protect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

The governing body of a municipal corporation entering into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating agreement described in this subsection (b) shall prescribe and collect, or cause to be prescribed and collected, reasonable rates, fees or charges for the services, facilities and commodities of the project or projects, and shall revise such rates, fees, or charges from time to time, whenever necessary, so that the project or projects shall be and always remain self-supporting. The rates, fees or charges prescribed shall be at least sufficient to produce revenue to provide for all expenses of operation and maintenance of the project or projects, including reasonable reserves therefor, and pay when due all bonds and notes and interest thereon and all obligations under any lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, including reasonable reserves therefor. A municipal corporation described in § 7-34-102, which enters into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract relating to a system or systems included within the definition of “public works” as set forth in § 7-34-102, shall be governed by the terms and requirements of § 7-34-115.

A municipal corporation entering into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract relating to a project hereunder is authorized to make such covenants and agreements with the public building authority or contracting party as such corporation is authorized to make with and for the benefit of bond holders under any of the laws of this state. The public building authority or contracting party shall have all the remedies provided to bond holders pursuant to title 7, chapter 34, or title 9, chapter 21, part 3, with respect to the municipal corporations described therein and the revenues pledged by the corporations, or pursuant to title 7, chapter 82, with respect to the municipal corporations described therein and the revenues pledged thereby.

Proceeds received from a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract with a public building authority or other contracting party under provisions of this chapter for school capital outlay purposes by a municipal corporation that is a county or metropolitan government within which an incorporated city or town or a special school district operates a school system shall be shared with such incorporated city or town or special school district system on the same basis as the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to title 49, chapter 3, part 10 are shared. The trustee of the county or treasurer of the metropolitan government shall pay over to the treasurer of the incorporated city or town or the special school district that amount of the proceeds which bears the same ratio to the entire amount of proceeds, net of all costs incurred in connection with the execution and delivery of the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract and any bonds or notes of the public building authority issued in connection with such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract, as the average daily attendance of the incorporated city or town or special school district for the year ending June 30 immediately preceding the receipt of the proceeds bears to the average daily attendance of the entire county or metropolitan government for the year ending June 30 immediately preceding the receipt of the proceeds. No proceeds to be shared hereunder shall be required to be disbursed to the incorporated city or town or special school district until the time the county or metropolitan government actually receives the proceeds of the lease, loan agreement, sales contract, or operating contract.

The governing body of any such incorporated city or town or special school district may, by resolution regularly adopted, waive its right to all or a portion of any funds due under this subsection (c).

In lieu of the levy and collection of the tax required pursuant to subsection (a), a county or metropolitan government may provide for the payment of the amounts due under such lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract by levying a tax only on that portion of the taxable property within the county or metropolitan government lying outside the territorial limits of the incorporated city or town or special school district independently operating its schools, and may in addition pledge and use for such purpose the proceeds of the county's or metropolitan government's share of the sales tax distributed under title 67, chapter 6, or a portion of the nonclassroom component of the basic education program funding generated for capital outlay purposes. In such event, the proceeds of the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract shall not be required to be shared with any incorporated city or town or special school district school system.

The proceeds of any lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract executed and delivered pursuant to this chapter to refund outstanding obligations issued by a county or metropolitan government for school capital outlay purposes shall not be required to be shared as provided herein, unless the outstanding obligations to be refunded were payable as provided in subdivision (c)(3) and the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract executed and delivered to accomplish such refunding is payable from taxes to be levied on all taxable property in the county or metropolitan government.

This subsection (c) is not applicable in counties and metropolitan governments having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or any municipality within such county served by a municipal or special school district.

The governing body of any municipal corporation not having the power of taxation and the state of Tennessee shall, upon entering into a lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract with a public building authority or other contracting party, make adequate provision for the payment of the annual amount payable under the lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 15; T.C.A., § 12-915; Acts 1982, ch. 902, §§ 11-13; 1984, ch. 823, § 7; 1987, ch. 181, § 1; 1993, ch. 514, § 9; 1995, ch. 74, § 4; 1997, ch. 405, §§ 3, 4; 2001, ch. 32, § 1; 2001, ch. 457, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.